Washington statutes.
RCW 2.28.030

Judicial officer defined—When disqualified.

A judicial officer is a person authorized to act as a judge in a court of justice. Such officer shall not act as such in a court of which he or she is a member in any of the following cases:

(1) In an action, suit, or proceeding to which he or she is a party, or in which he or she is directly interested.

(2) When he or she was not present and sitting as a member of the court at the hearing of a matter submitted for its decision.

(3) When he or she is related to either party by consanguinity or affinity within the third degree. The degree shall be ascertained and computed by ascending from the judge to the common ancestor and descending to the party, counting a degree for each person in both lines, including the judge and party and excluding the common ancestor.

(4) When he or she has been attorney in the action, suit, or proceeding in question for either party; but this section does not apply to an application to change the place of trial, or the regulation of the order of business in court.

In the cases specified in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, the disqualification may be waived by the parties, and except in the supreme court and the court of appeals shall be deemed to be waived unless an application for a change of the place of trial be made as provided by law.

[ 2011 c 336 s 39; 1971 c 81 s 11; 1895 c 39 s 1; 1891 c 54 s 3; RRS s 54.]